Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2645
Violation of act; claim of damages;
inspection; failure to file report or
cooperate with department; effect.

(1) A person
claiming damages from a pesticide use may file with the department a written
report claiming that the person has been damaged. The report shall be filed
as soon as possible following the day of the alleged occurrence.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in the Pesticide Act, upon receipt
of a report if the department has reasonable cause to believe that a violation
of the act has occurred, it shall investigate such report to determine if
any violation has occurred and if any further enforcement action shall be
taken under the act. The department is not required to investigate any complaint
that the department determines is made more than ninety days after the person
complaining knew of the damages, is outside the scope of the Pesticide Act,
or is frivolous or minor. If a complaint is investigated, the department shall
notify the licensee, owner, or lessee of the property on which the alleged
act occurred and any other person who may be charged with responsibility for
the damages claimed. The department shall furnish copies of the report to
such licensee, owner, lessee, or other person upon written request.

(3) The department shall inspect damages whenever possible and shall
report its findings to the person claiming damage and to the person alleged
to have caused the damage. The claimant shall permit the department and the
licensee to observe, within reasonable hours, the property alleged to have
been damaged.

(4) Failure to file a report shall not bar maintenance of a civil or
criminal action. If a person fails to file a report or cooperate with the department and is the
only person claiming injury from the particular use of a pesticide, the department
may, if in the public interest, refuse to take
action or hold a hearing for the denial, suspension, or revocation
of a license issued under the act to the person alleged to have caused the
damage.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB100, § 6.